Wisconsin, session 2025, SB188.
do enact as follows:SB188,13Section 1. 757.05 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB188,2,104757.05 (1) (a) Whenever a court imposes a fine or forfeiture for a violation of 1state law or for a violation of a municipal or county ordinance except for a violation 2of s. 101.123 (2) or (2m), for a financial responsibility violation under s. 344.62 (2), 3or for a violation of state laws or municipal or county ordinances involving 4nonmoving traffic violations, violations under s. 343.51 (1m) (b), or safety belt use 5violations under s. 347.48 (2m), there shall be imposed in addition a penalty 6surcharge under ch. 814 in an amount of 26 percent of the fine or forfeiture 7imposed. If multiple offenses are involved, the penalty surcharge shall be based 8upon the total fine or forfeiture for all offenses. When a fine or forfeiture is 9suspended or reduced in whole or in part, the penalty surcharge shall be reduced in 10proportion to the suspension or reduction.SB188,2,1111